Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-319 Miscellaneous investments.
(a) An insurer may loan or invest its funds in an aggregate amount not
exceeding the lesser of the following sums: Five per cent of its assets or
fifty per cent of its surplus over its capital and other liabilities, or, if a
mutual or reciprocal insurer, fifty per cent of its surplus over the minimum
required surplus, in kinds of loans or investments not otherwise specifically
made eligible for investment and not specifically prohibited or made ineligible
by this or other provisions of this article.

(b) No such loan or investment shall be
represented by:

(1) Any item described in section 431:5-202;

(2) Any loan or investment of a kind specifically
made eligible under any other provision of this code; or

(3) Any loan, investment, or assets theretofore
acquired or held by the insurer under any other category of loans or
investments.

(c) No one investment or loan shall exceed the
amount specified in subsection (a) or one per cent of insurer's assets,
whichever is the lesser.

(d) The insurer shall keep a separate record
of all investments acquired under this section. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next